Colorado, session 2026A, HB1080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7.5-107.3, amend
(1)(a), (2)(a), (2)(c), (3), (4)(a), (5), and (6) as follows:
1-7.5-107.3. Verification of signatures - rules.
(1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, in
every mail ballot election that is coordinated with or conducted by the
county clerk and recorder, an election judge A TEAM OF BIPARTISAN
ELECTION JUDGES shall compare the signature on the self-affirmation on
each return envelope with the signature of the eligible elector stored in
the statewide voter registration system in accordance with subsections (2),
(3), and (4) of this section AND ANY RULES ADOPTED BY THE SECRETARY
OF STATE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) (I) If, upon comparing the signature of an eligible elector
on the self-affirmation on the return envelope with the signature of the
eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, the TEAM
OF BIPARTISAN election judge JUDGES determines that the signatures do
not match, or if a signature verification device used pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section is unable to determine that the signatures
match, two other election judges of different political party affiliations
ONE OTHER ELECTION JUDGE OF ANY POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION shall
simultaneously compare the signatures;
(II) If, both AFTER COMPLETING THE REVIEW OF SIGNATURES
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE other election
-2- HB26-1080

judges agree JUDGE AGREES that the signatures do not match, the county
clerk and recorder shall, within three days after the signature deficiency
has been confirmed, but in no event later than two days after election day,
send to the eligible elector at the address indicated in the registration
records and to the eligible elector's electronic mail address if available a
letter explaining the discrepancy in signatures and a form for the eligible
elector to confirm that the elector returned a ballot to the county clerk and
recorder. If the county clerk and recorder receives the form within eight
days after election day confirming that the elector returned a ballot to the
county clerk and recorder and enclosing a copy of the elector's
identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5), and if the ballot is
otherwise valid, the ballot shall be counted. If the eligible elector returns
the form indicating that the elector did not return a ballot to the county
clerk and recorder, or if the eligible elector does not return the form
within eight days after election day, the self-affirmation on the return
envelope shall be categorized as incorrect, the ballot shall not be counted,
and the county clerk and recorder shall send copies of the eligible
elector's signature on the return envelope and the signature stored in the
statewide voter registration system to the district attorney for
investigation.
(c) In the case of a disagreement among the election judges as to
whether the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation on the
return envelope matches the signature of the eligible elector stored in the
statewide voter registration system pursuant to the procedures specified
in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, the signatures are deemed to match, and the election judge
TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES shall follow the procedures
-3- HB26-1080

specified in section 1-7.5-107 (6) concerning the qualification and
counting of mail ballots.
(3) If the election judge TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES
determines that the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation
matches the elector's signature stored in the statewide voter registration
system, the election judge TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES shall
follow the procedures specified in section 1-7.5-107 (6) concerning the
qualification and counting of mail ballots.
(4) (a) An election judge A TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES
shall not determine that the signature of an eligible elector on the
self-affirmation does not match the signature of that eligible elector
stored in the statewide voter registration system solely on the basis of
substitution of initials or use of a common nickname.
(5) (a) A county clerk and recorder may allow an election judge
A TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES to use a signature verification
device to compare the signature on the self-affirmation on a return
envelope of an eligible elector's ballot with the signature of the elector
stored in the statewide voter registration system in accordance with this
subsection (5) and any rules promulgated by the secretary of state
pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) If a signature verification device determines that the signature
on the self-affirmation on a return envelope of an eligible elector's ballot
matches the signature of the elector stored in the statewide voter
registration system, the signature on the self-affirmation is deemed
verified, and the election judge TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES
shall follow the procedures specified in section 1-7.5-107 (6) concerning
the qualification and counting of mail ballots. If a signature verification
-4- HB26-1080

device is unable to determine that the signature on the self-affirmation on
a return envelope of an eligible elector's mail ballot matches the signature
of the elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, an election
judge A TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION JUDGES shall compare the
signatures in accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.
(6) The secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with
article 4 of title 24 C.R.S., establishing procedures for using signature
verification devices AND FOR USING A TEAM OF BIPARTISAN ELECTION
JUDGES to process ballots used in mail ballot elections pursuant to this
article ARTICLE 7.5.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1080